Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1622
Participation.

A state employee may participate at open enrollment in the pilot program on a first-come, first-served basis dependent on participation by participating providers and limitations on enrollees served per participating providers.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 5.